District of Columbia statutes.
34-1805

Report to the Council.

Not later than September 15, 2003, the Mayor shall submit to the Council an analysis of the expenses of the Fund, which analysis shall include a recommendation as to whether the tax imposed under § 34-1803 should be adjusted. In preparing this analysis:

(1)

It shall be assumed that funding for call center operating personnel will be shifted from the Fund to the General Fund of the District of Columbia; and

(2)

A replacement reserve schedule for all technology equipment and software shall be used.

Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 605a
as added Nov. 13, 2003, D.C. Law 15-39, § 502(c), 50 DCR 5668
For temporary (90-day) addition, see § 502(e) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-105, June 20 2003, 50 DCR 5613).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 502(e) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-149, September 22, 2003, 50 DCR 8360).